Utah statutes.
72-6-112.   Traffic Noise Abatement Program -- Uses.

(1)  There is created the Traffic Noise Abatement Program.

(2)  The program consists of money generated from the following revenue sources:

(a)  any voluntary contributions received for traffic noise abatement; and

(b)  appropriations made to the program by the Legislature.

(3)  The department shall use program money as prioritized by the commission and as provided by law for the study, design, construction, and maintenance of noise abatement measures.

(4)  All funding for the Traffic Noise Abatement Program shall be nonlapsing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

